Louisiana, session 2026, HB438.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:97.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§97.3. Unlawful operation of a commercial motor vehicle
A. No person who fails to meet the qualification requirements contained in
49 CFR Part 391 shall operate a commercial motor vehicle in this state.
B.(1) Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be fined not more
than five hundred dollars.
(2) Upon a second or subsequent conviction, the offender shall be fined not
more than one thousand dollars.
C. For the purposes of this Section, "commercial motor vehicle" has the
same meaning as provided in R.S. 32:401.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1255 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 438